Maryland, session 2025, HB0136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
11–1007.
(b) If a physician, a qualified health care provider, or a hospital provides a service
described in subsection (c) of this section to a victim of an alleged rape or sexual offense or
a victim of alleged child sexual abuse:
(1) the services shall be provided without charge to the individual; and
(2) the physician, qualified health care provider, or hospital:
(i) is entitled to be paid by [the Criminal Injuries Compensation
Board as provided under Subtitle 8 of this title] THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF CRIME
PREVENTION AND POLICY for the costs of providing the services;
(ii) shall provide written or electronic verification signed by a
physician or qualified health care provider to [the Criminal Injuries Compensation Board]
THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF CRIME PREVENTION AND POLICY that services
described in subsection (c) of this section were rendered to a victim of an alleged rape or
sexual offense or a victim of alleged child sexual abuse; and
– 1 –

Ch. 89 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) may not include in any request to obtain payment under this
subsection a narrative describing the alleged offense of a victim or a photograph of the
victim.
11–1008.
(c) (2) (i) A victim who receives treatment under this subsection may
decline to provide health insurance information or submit personal information to a
payment assistance program if the victim believes that providing the information would
interfere with personal privacy or safety.
(ii) The physician, qualified health care provider, or hospital
providing a victim with treatment and follow–up care under paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall inform the victim of the victim’s right to decline to provide health
insurance information or submit personal information to a payment assistance program.
(iii) If a victim declines to provide health insurance information or to
submit personal information to a payment assistance program:
1. the treatment and follow–up care shall be provided
without charge to the victim; and
2. the physician, qualified health care provider, or hospital
providing the treatment or follow–up care is entitled to be paid by [the Criminal Injuries
Compensation Board as provided under Subtitle 8 of this title] THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE
OF CRIME PREVENTION AND POLICY for the costs of providing the services.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 2 –